Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.410

General or special verdicts.

The verdict of a jury is either general or special.

[ 1984 c 76 s 4; Code 1881 s 240; 1877 p 49 s 244; 1869 p 59 s 244; 1854 p 167 s 198; RRS s 362.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: See CR 49.